Utah statutes.
63A-3-306.   Hearing examiner -- Procedures -- Adjudicative proceedings.

(1) (a)  The hearing shall be held before a hearing examiner designated by the state.

(b)  The hearing examiner may not be an officer or employee of the entity in state government responsible for collecting or administering the account.

(2)  The state shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in its adjudicative proceedings.

